Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2554.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 302(a) of Title 30 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 302. Executive director.(a) Appointment and compensation.--The commission shall appoint [to serve at its pleasure and, with the approval of the Governor, fix the compensation of], by and with the advice and consent of a majority of the members elected to the Senate, an executive director who shall be the chief executive officer of the commission and attend to its administrative work and have charge of all activities under the jurisdiction of the commission. The executive director shall be the chief waterways <--<--123456789101112131415161718 patrolman of the commission and shall have charge of, direct, supervise, and control all waterways patrolmen, deputy waterways patrolmen and employees of the commission. No member of the commission nor any person who has served as a member thereof within one year shall be eligible for appointment as executive director. If a vacancy occurs in the office of executive director, the commission shall conduct the following before appointing an executive director:(1) Develop a job description for the position, which shall include the requirement that an individual applying to serve as executive director have executive experience and that the individual be well informed on the subjects of conservation, restoration, budgeting, facilities management, human resource management, fish and fishing and boats and boating.(2) Transmit notice of the vacancy to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and post notice of the vacancy on the commission's publicly accessible Internet website.(3) Conduct a competitive, national search for qualified candidates.(a.1) Acting executive director.--If a vacancy occurs in the office of executive director, the commission may select an individual to serve at the pleasure of the commission as acting executive director for no more than two consecutive three-month periods before appointing an individual as provided under subsection (a). An individual serving as acting executive director may apply to fill the vacancy in the office of executive director.(a.2) Compensation.--The commission shall, with the approval 20260HB2554PN3581 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the Governor, fix the compensation of the executive director.* * *Section 2. Section 302(a) of Title 34 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 302. Director.(a) Appointment.--The commission shall [select] appoint a director[.] by and with the advice and consent of a majority of the members of the Senate. No member of the commission nor anyone who has served as a member of the commission within one year after service shall be eligible for [selection] appointment as director. [The director shall serve as such at the pleasure of the commission.] If a vacancy occurs in the office of director, the commission shall conduct the following before appointing a director:(1) Develop a job description for the position, which shall include the requirement that an individual applying to serve as director have executive experience and that the individual be well informed on the subjects of land management, human resource management, budgeting, wildlife conservation and restoration.(2) Transmit notice of the vacancy to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and post notice of the vacancy on the commission's publicly accessible Internet website.(3) Conduct a competitive, national search for qualified candidates.(a.1) Acting director.--If a vacancy occurs in the office of director, the commission may select an individual to serve at the pleasure of the commission as acting director for no more than two consecutive three-month periods before appointing an 20260HB2554PN3581 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individual as provided under subsection (a). An individual serving as acting director may apply to fill the vacancy in the office of director.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2554PN3581 - 4 - 12345